Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-114.02
Clerk; charges; authorized.

The Clerk of the Legislature shall be authorized to make such charges, subject to the approval of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, to recover costs and expenses of (1) copying files and records in the clerk's possession, (2) preparing certificates, (3) handling and mailing individual bills and bill subscriptions, and (4) such publications as may be authorized by the Legislature or the Executive Board of the Legislative Council.

Laws 1977, LB 231, § 2.